Hawaii statutes.
§514E-17 Release of purchaser's funds,
notes, and contracts from escrow without a closing. A purchaser's funds,
negotiable instruments, and purchase money contracts may be released from
escrow without a closing as follows:

(1) If a purchaser or developer gives a valid notice
of cancellation of the contract pursuant to section 514E-8, all of the
purchaser's funds and any negotiable instruments and purchase money contracts
made by the purchaser shall be returned to the purchaser within fifteen days
after the notice of cancellation is received.

(2) If a purchaser or developer properly terminates a
contract pursuant to its terms, or if a developer or prospective purchaser
terminates a reservation agreement, all of the purchaser's funds and any
negotiable instruments and purchase money contracts made by the purchaser or
prospective purchaser shall be delivered in accordance with the contract or
reservation agreement.

(3) If the purchaser defaults in the performance of
the purchaser's obligations under the contract, all of the purchaser's funds
and any negotiable instruments or purchase money contracts made by the
purchaser under the contract shall be delivered in accordance with the
contract.

(4) If purchaser's funds are to be used for
construction the funds may be disbursed by the escrow agent from time to time
to pay for:

(A) Construction costs of the buildings and
improvements in proportion to the valuation of the work completed by the
contractor in accordance with the contract documents, as certified by a
registered architect or engineer and approved for payment by the construction
lender;

(B) Architectural, engineering, and interior
design service fees in proportion to the services performed within each phase
of services, as approved by the construction lender;

(C) The costs of purchasing furnishings and
fixtures for the time share units, as approved by the construction lender; and

(D) Finance and legal fees, and other
incidental expenses of constructing the time share units or developing the time
share plan as approved by the construction lender;

provided that no such disbursements shall be made
unless the developer first deposits with the director (i) a copy of the
executed construction contract, (ii) a copy of executed performance and labor
and material payment bonds in an amount which is not less than one hundred per
cent of the cost of construction and covering any changes to the contract which
do not in the aggregate increase the amount of the construction contract by
more than ten per cent, (iii) a verified statement showing all costs involved
in completing the project, and (iv) satisfactory evidence acceptable to the
director of funds sufficient to cover the total costs of constructing,
furnishing, and completing the project from purchaser's funds, equity funds,
interim or permanent loan commitments or other sources. [L 1982, c 186, §4; gen
ch 1985]

Revision Note

Subsection (a) designation deleted.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next